Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-2426
Irrigation or drainage ditch, canal, or lateral; wall, enclose, or cover; procedure.

Any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village may wall, enclose, or cover in a manner that will not restrict or impair the intended purpose, function, or operation of a segment of any irrigation or drainage ditch, canal, or lateral, whether on public or private property, which lies within the corporate limits of such city or village, and for this purpose may acquire and hold land or an interest in land. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the taking of property without payment of compensation when required by law. Such city or village may undertake and finance a project authorized by this section either independently or jointly with any person owning or operating such irrigation ditch, canal, or lateral. If such project is undertaken independently, the owner or operator of such irrigation ditch, canal, or lateral shall approve the design of the project prior to any construction.

Laws 1979, LB 13, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 164.
September 1, 2019